Hawaii statutes.
[§572C-1] Purpose. The purpose of this
chapter is to extend certain rights and benefits which are presently available
only to married couples to couples composed of two individuals who are legally
prohibited from marrying under state law. [L 1997, c 383, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next